Florida, session 2026, HB189.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
144
145 Section 1. Present paragraph (i) of subsection (3) of
146 section 16.712, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph
147 (k), new paragraphs (i) and (j) are added to that subsection,
148 and paragraph (h) of that subsection is amended, to read:
149 16.712 Florida Gaming Control Commission authorizations,
150 duties, and responsibilities.—
Page 6 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
151 (3) By December 1 of each year, the commission shall make
152 an annual report to the Governor, the President of the Senate,
153 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The report
154 must, at a minimum, include all of the following:
155 (h) A summary of actions taken and investigations
156 conducted by the commission, including the number of
157 investigations that led to criminal charges or any information
158 being filed and the resolution of such criminal charges or case.
159 (i) The number of complaints received by the commission
160 categorized by subject matter or the type of complaint and a
161 summary of the action taken on each complaint by the commission.
162 (j) A list of property seized by the commission during the
163 course of investigations, and the disposition of such property,
164 including a list of forfeiture actions.
165 Section 2. Paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (2) of
166 section 16.713, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
167 16.713 Florida Gaming Control Commission; appointment and
168 employment restrictions.—
169 (2) PROHIBITIONS FOR EMPLOYEES AND COMMISSIONERS; PERSONS
170 INELIGIBLE FOR APPOINTMENT TO AND EMPLOYMENT WITH THE
171 COMMISSION.—
172 (a) A person may not, for the 2 years immediately
173 preceding the date of appointment to or employment with the
174 commission and while appointed to or employed with the
175 commission:
Page 7 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
176 1. Hold a permit or license issued under chapter 550 or a
177 license issued under chapter 551 or chapter 849; be an officer,
178 official, or employee of such permitholder or licensee; or be an
179 ultimate equitable owner, as defined in s. 550.002(37), of such
180 permitholder or licensee;
181 2. Be an officer, official, employee, or other person with
182 duties or responsibilities relating to a gaming operation owned
183 by an Indian tribe that has a valid and active compact with the
184 state; be a contractor or subcontractor of such tribe or an
185 entity employed, licensed, or contracted by such tribe; or be an
186 ultimate equitable owner, as defined in s. 550.002(37), of such
187 entity;
188 3. Be a registered lobbyist for the executive or
189 legislative branch, except while a commissioner or employee of
190 the commission when officially representing the commission or
191 unless the person registered as a lobbyist for the executive or
192 legislative branch while employed by a state agency as defined
193 in s. 110.107 during the normal course of his or her employment
194 with such agency and he or she has not lobbied on behalf of any
195 entity other than a state agency during the 2 years immediately
196 preceding the date of his or her appointment to or employment
197 with the commission; or
198 4. Be a bingo game operator or an employee of a bingo game
199 operator; or
200 5. Be an employee, associate, owner, or contractor for any
Page 8 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
201 person or entity that conducts or facilitates an activity
202 regulated, enforced, or investigated by the commission,
203 including fantasy sports contests and other betting activities.
204 (b) A person is ineligible for appointment to or
205 employment with the commission if, within the 2 years
206 immediately preceding such appointment or employment, he or she
207 violated paragraph (a) or solicited or accepted employment with,
208 acquired any direct or indirect interest in, or had any direct
209 or indirect business association, partnership, or financial
210 relationship with, or is a relative of:
211 1. Any person or entity who is an applicant, licensee, or
212 registrant with the commission; or
213 2. Any officer, official, employee, or other person with
214 duties or responsibilities relating to a gaming operation owned
215 by an Indian tribe that has a valid and active compact with the
216 state; any contractor or subcontractor of such tribe or an
217 entity employed, licensed, or contracted by such tribe; or any
218 ultimate equitable owner, as defined in s. 550.002(37), of such
219 entity; or
220 3. Any person or entity that conducts or facilitates an
221 activity regulated, enforced, or investigated by the commission,
222 including fantasy sports contests and other betting activities.
223
224 For the purposes of this subsection, the term "relative" means a
225 spouse, father, mother, son, daughter, grandfather, grandmother,
Page 9 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
226 brother, sister, uncle, aunt, cousin, nephew, niece, father-in-
227 law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, brother-in-law,
228 sister-in-law, stepfather, stepmother, stepson, stepdaughter,
229 stepbrother, stepsister, half brother, or half sister.
230 Section 3. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) and paragraphs
231 (b) and (c) of subsection (2) of section 16.715, Florida
232 Statutes, are amended to read:
233 16.715 Florida Gaming Control Commission standards of
234 conduct; ex parte communications.—
235 (1) STANDARDS OF CONDUCT.—
236 (b)1. A commissioner or employee of the commission may not
237 accept anything from any business entity that, either directly
238 or indirectly, owns or controls any person regulated by the
239 commission or from any business entity that, either directly or
240 indirectly, is an affiliate or subsidiary of any person
241 regulated by the commission.
242 2. A commissioner or an employee may attend conferences,
243 along with associated meals and events that are generally
244 available to all conference participants, without payment of any
245 fees in addition to the conference fee. Additionally, while
246 attending a conference, a commissioner or an employee may attend
247 meetings, meals, or events that are not sponsored, in whole or
248 in part, by any representative of any person regulated by the
249 commission and that are limited to commissioners or employees
250 only, committee members, or speakers if the commissioner or
Page 10 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
251 employee is a member of a committee of the association of
252 regulatory agencies which organized the conference or is a
253 speaker at the conference. It is not a violation of this
254 subparagraph for a commissioner or an employee to attend a
255 conference for which conference participants who are employed by
256 a person regulated by the commission have paid a higher
257 conference registration fee than the commissioner or employee,
258 or to attend a meal or event that is generally available to all
259 conference participants without payment of any fees in addition
260 to the conference fee and that is sponsored, in whole or in
261 part, by a person regulated by the commission.
262 3. While employed, and for 2 years after service as a
263 commissioner or for 2 years after employment with the
264 commission, a commissioner or an employee may not accept any
265 form of employment with or engage in any business activity with
266 any business entity that, either directly or indirectly, owns or
267 controls any person regulated by the commission; any person
268 regulated by the commission; or any business entity that, either
269 directly or indirectly, is an affiliate or subsidiary of any
270 person regulated by the commission; or be an employee,
271 associate, owner, or contractor for any person or entity that
272 conducts or facilitates an activity regulated, enforced, or
273 investigated by the commission, including fantasy sports
274 contests and other betting activities.
275 4. While employed, and for 2 years after service as a
Page 11 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
276 commissioner or for 2 years after employment with the
277 commission, a commissioner, an employee, or a relative living in
278 the same household as a commissioner or an employee may not have
279 any financial interest, other than shares in a mutual fund, in
280 any person regulated by the commission; in any business entity
281 that, either directly or indirectly, owns or controls any person
282 regulated by the commission; or in any business entity that,
283 either directly or indirectly, is an affiliate or a subsidiary
284 of any person regulated by the commission; or be an employee,
285 associate, owner, or contractor for any person or entity that
286 conducts or facilitates an activity regulated, enforced, or
287 investigated by the commission, including fantasy sports
288 contests and other betting activities. If a commissioner, an
289 employee, or a relative living in the same household as a
290 commissioner or an employee acquires any financial interest
291 prohibited by this subsection during the commissioner's term of
292 office or the employee's employment with the commission as a
293 result of events or actions beyond the commissioner's, the
294 employee's, or the relative's control, he or she shall
295 immediately sell such financial interest. For the purposes of
296 this subsection, the term "relative" has the same meaning as in
297 s. 16.713(2)(b).
298 5. A commissioner or an employee may not accept anything
299 from a party in a proceeding currently pending before the
300 commission.
Page 12 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
301 6. A commissioner may not serve as the representative of
302 any political party or on any executive committee or other
303 governing body of a political party; serve as an executive
304 officer or employee of any political party, committee,
305 organization, or association; receive remuneration for
306 activities on behalf of any candidate for public office; engage
307 on behalf of any candidate for public office in the solicitation
308 of votes or other activities on behalf of such candidacy; or
309 become a candidate for election to any public office without
310 first resigning from office.
311 7. A commissioner, during his or her term of office, may
312 not make any public comment regarding the merits of any
313 proceeding under ss. 120.569 and 120.57 currently pending before
314 the commission.
315 8. A commissioner or an employee may not act in an
316 unprofessional manner at any time during the performance of
317 official duties.
318 9. A commissioner or an employee must avoid impropriety in
319 all activities and must act at all times in a manner that
320 promotes public confidence in the integrity and impartiality of
321 the commission.
322 10. A commissioner or an employee may not directly or
323 indirectly, through staff or other means, solicit anything of
324 value from any person regulated by the commission, or from any
325 business entity that, whether directly or indirectly, is an
Page 13 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
326 affiliate or a subsidiary of any person regulated by the
327 commission, or from any party appearing in a proceeding
328 considered by the commission in the last 2 years.
329 11. A commissioner may not lobby the Governor or any
330 agency of the state, members or employees of the Legislature, or
331 any county or municipal government or governmental agency except
332 to represent the commission in an official capacity.
333 (2) FORMER COMMISSIONERS AND EMPLOYEES.—
334 (b) A commissioner, the executive director, or an employee
335 of the commission may not, for the 2 years immediately following
336 the date of resignation or termination from the commission:
337 1. Hold a permit or license issued under chapter 550, or a
338 license issued under chapter 551 or chapter 849; be an officer,
339 official, or employee of such permitholder or licensee; or be an
340 ultimate equitable owner, as defined in s. 550.002(37), of such
341 permitholder or licensee; or be an employee, associate, owner,
342 or contractor for any person or entity that conducts or
343 facilitates an activity regulated, enforced, or investigated by
344 the commission, including fantasy sports contests and other
345 betting activities;
346 2. Accept employment by or compensation from a business
347 entity that, directly or indirectly, owns or controls a person
348 regulated by the commission; from a person regulated by the
349 commission; from a business entity which, directly or
350 indirectly, is an affiliate or subsidiary of a person regulated
Page 14 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
351 by the commission; or from a business entity or trade
352 association that has been a party to a commission proceeding
353 within the 2 years preceding the member's resignation or
354 termination of service on the commission; or from any person or
355 entity that conducts or facilitates an activity regulated,
356 enforced, or investigated by the commission, including fantasy
357 sports contests and other betting activities; or
358 3. Be a bingo game operator or an employee of a bingo game
359 operator.
360 (c) A person employed by the commission may not, for the 2
361 years immediately following the date of termination or
362 resignation from employment with the commission:
363 1. Hold a permit or license issued under chapter 550, or a
364 license issued under chapter 551 or chapter 849; be an officer,
365 official, or employee of such permitholder or licensee; or be an
366 ultimate equitable owner, as defined in s. 550.002(37), of such
367 permitholder or licensee; or be an employee, associate, owner,
368 or contractor for any person or entity that conducts or
369 facilitates an activity regulated, enforced, or investigated by
370 the commission, including fantasy sports contests and other
371 betting activities; or
372 2. Be a bingo game operator or an employee of a bingo game
373 operator.
374 Section 4. Paragraph (a) of subsections (1) and paragraph
375 (a) of subsection (3) of section 20.055, Florida Statutes, are
Page 15 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
376 amended to read:
377 20.055 Agency inspectors general.—
378 (1) As used in this section, the term:
379 (a) "Agency head" means the Governor, a Cabinet officer,
380 or a secretary or executive director as those terms are defined
381 in s. 20.03, the chair of the Public Service Commission, the
382 Director of the Office of Insurance Regulation of the Financial
383 Services Commission, the Director of the Office of Financial
384 Regulation of the Financial Services Commission, the board of
385 directors of the Florida Housing Finance Corporation, the
386 commissioners chair of the Florida Gaming Control Commission,
387 and the Chief Justice of the State Supreme Court.
388 (3)(a)1. For state agencies under the jurisdiction of the
389 Cabinet or the Governor and Cabinet, or for the Florida Gaming
390 Control Commission, the inspector general shall be appointed by
391 the agency head. For state agencies under the jurisdiction of
392 the Governor, the inspector general shall be appointed by the
393 Chief Inspector General. The agency head or Chief Inspector
394 General shall notify the Governor in writing of his or her
395 intention to hire the inspector general at least 7 days before
396 an offer of employment. The inspector general shall be appointed
397 without regard to political affiliation.
398 2. Within 60 days after a vacancy or anticipated vacancy
399 in the position of inspector general, the agency head or, for
400 agencies under the jurisdiction of the Governor, the Chief
Page 16 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
401 Inspector General, shall initiate a national search for an
402 inspector general and shall set the salary of the inspector
403 general. Effective July 1, 2017, an agency that enters into an
404 employment agreement, or renewal or renegotiation of an existing
405 contract or employment agreement with an inspector general or
406 deputy inspector, may not offer a bonus on work performance in
407 the contract or agreement and the awarding of such bonuses is
408 prohibited. In the event of a vacancy in the position of
409 inspector general, the agency head or, for agencies under the
410 jurisdiction of the Governor, the Chief Inspector General, may
411 appoint other office of inspector general management personnel
412 as interim inspector general until such time as a successor
413 inspector general is appointed.
414 3. A former or current elected official may not be
415 appointed inspector general within 5 years after the end of such
416 individual's period of service. This restriction does not
417 prohibit the reappointment of a current inspector general.
418 Section 5. Present subsections (8) and (9) of section
419 546.10, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (9) and
420 (10), respectively, and a new subsection (8) is added to that
421 section, to read:
422 546.10 Amusement games or machines.—
423 (8)(a)1. Before purchasing or installing a game or machine
424 on the premises of any veterans' service organization granted a
425 federal charter under Title 36, U.S.C., or a division, a
Page 17 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
426 department, a post, or a chapter of such organization, for which
427 an alcoholic beverage license has been issued, and the veterans'
428 service organization is in doubt about whether a machine meets
429 the definition of an amusement machine under this section, the
430 organization may petition the Florida Gaming Control Commission
431 for a declaratory statement under s. 120.565 on whether the
432 operation of the game or machine complies with this section or
433 chapter 849. An organization awaiting a declaratory statement
434 from the commission may not purchase or install such game or
435 machine until the declaratory statement is issued.
436 2. If there is a game or machine currently on the premises
437 of any veterans' service organization granted a federal charter
438 under Title 36, U.S.C., or a division, a department, a post, or
439 a chapter of such organization, for which an alcoholic beverage
440 license has been issued and the veterans' service organization
441 is in doubt about whether a machine meets the definition of an
442 amusement machine under this section, the organization may
443 petition the commission for a declaratory statement pursuant to
444 s. 120.565 on whether the operation of the game or machine
445 complies with this section or would be a violation of this
446 section or chapter 849. If the game, machine, premises, or
447 organization is the subject of an ongoing criminal
448 investigation, the organization is not entitled to petition the
449 commission for a declaratory statement under this subsection and
450 the commission may deny a petition on such grounds.
Page 18 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
451 3. The commission shall issue a declaratory statement
452 pursuant to this subsection within 60 days after receiving a
453 petition requesting such statement. The commission may not deny
454 a petition that is validly requested pursuant to this subsection
455 and s. 120.565.
456 (b) A petition made under this subsection must provide
457 enough information for the commission to issue the declaratory
458 statement and must be accompanied by the exact specifications
459 for the type of game or machine that the organization will
460 purchase or install or currently has on the premises. The
461 declaratory statement is valid only for the game or machine for
462 which it is requested and is invalid if the specifications for
463 the game or the machine have been changed.
464 (c) The declaratory statement is binding on the commission
465 and may be introduced in any subsequent proceedings as evidence
466 of a good faith effort to comply with this section or chapter
467 849.
468 (d) This subsection does not prevent the commission or any
469 other criminal justice agency as defined in s. 943.045 from
470 detecting, apprehending, and arresting a person for any alleged
471 violation of this chapter, chapter 24, part II of chapter 285,
472 chapter 550, chapter 551, or chapter 849, or any rule adopted
473 pursuant thereto, or of any law of this state.
474 (e) This subsection does not require an owner or an
475 operator of an amusement game or machine under this section to
Page 19 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
476 request or obtain a declaratory statement in order to operate
477 pursuant to this section.
478 Section 6. Subsection (37) of section 550.002, Florida
479 Statutes, is amended to read:
480 550.002 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the term:
481 (37) "Ultimate equitable owner" means a natural person
482 who, directly or indirectly, owns or controls 5 percent or more
483 of an ownership interest in a corporation, foreign corporation,
484 or alien business organization, regardless of whether such
485 person owns or controls such ownership through one or more
486 natural persons or one or more proxies, powers of attorney,
487 nominees, corporations, associations, partnerships, trusts,
488 joint stock companies, or other entities or devices, or any
489 combination thereof.
490 Section 7. Paragraph (b) of subsection (11) and subsection
491 (12) of section 550.054, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
492 550.054 Application for permit to conduct pari-mutuel
493 wagering.—
494 (11)
495 (b) If a permit to conduct pari-mutuel wagering is held by
496 a corporation or business entity other than an individual, the
497 transfer of any 10 percent or more of the stock or other
498 evidence of ownership or equity in the permitholder may not be
499 made without the prior approval of the transferee by the
500 commission pursuant to s. 550.1815.
Page 20 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
501 (12) Changes in ownership or interest of a pari-mutuel
502 permit of any 5 percent or more of the stock or other evidence
503 of ownership or equity in the permitholder shall be approved by
504 the commission before prior to such change, unless the owner is
505 an existing owner of that permit who was previously approved by
506 the commission. Changes in ownership or interest of a pari-
507 mutuel permit of less than 5 percent shall be reported to the
508 commission within 20 days of the change. The commission may then
509 conduct an investigation related to the request for to ensure
510 that the permit is properly updated to show the change in
511 ownership or interest.
512 Section 8. Subsection (3) of section 550.09512, Florida
513 Statutes, is amended to read:
514 550.09512 Harness horse taxes; abandoned interest in a
515 permit for nonpayment of taxes.—
516 (3)(a) The permit of a harness horse permitholder who is
517 conducting live harness horse performances and who does not pay
518 tax on handle for any such performances conducted during any 2
519 consecutive state fiscal years shall be void and may not be
520 reissued unless such failure to operate and pay tax on handle
521 was the direct result of fire, strike, war, hurricane, pandemic,
522 or other disaster or event beyond the ability of the
523 permitholder to control. Financial hardship to the permitholder
524 shall not, in and of itself, constitute just cause for failure
525 to operate and pay tax on handle.
Page 21 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
526 (b) In order to maximize the tax revenues to the state,
527 the commission shall reissue an escheated harness horse permit
528 to a qualified applicant pursuant to the provisions of this
529 chapter as for the issuance of an initial permit. However, the
530 provisions of this chapter relating to referendum requirements
531 for a pari-mutuel permit shall not apply to the reissuance of an
532 escheated harness horse permit. As specified in the application
533 and upon approval by the commission of an application for the
534 permit, the new permitholder shall be authorized to operate a
535 harness horse facility anywhere in the same county in which the
536 escheated permit was authorized to be operated, notwithstanding
537 the provisions of s. 550.054(2) relating to mileage limitations.
538 Section 9. Subsection (3) of section 550.09515, Florida
539 Statutes, is amended to read:
540 550.09515 Thoroughbred horse taxes; abandoned interest in
541 a permit for nonpayment of taxes.—
542 (3)(a) The permit of a thoroughbred horse permitholder who
543 does not pay tax on handle for live thoroughbred horse
544 performances for a full schedule of live races during any 2
545 consecutive state fiscal years shall be void and shall not be
546 reissued escheat to and become the property of the state unless
547 such failure to operate and pay tax on handle was the direct
548 result of fire, strike, war, or other disaster or event beyond
549 the ability of the permitholder to control. Financial hardship
550 to the permitholder does shall not, in and of itself, constitute
Page 22 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
551 just cause for failure to operate and pay tax on handle.
552 (b) In order to maximize the tax revenues to the state,
553 the commission shall reissue an escheated thoroughbred horse
554 permit to a qualified applicant pursuant to the provisions of
555 this chapter as for the issuance of an initial permit. However,
556 the provisions of this chapter relating to referendum
557 requirements for a pari-mutuel permit shall not apply to the
558 reissuance of an escheated thoroughbred horse permit. As
559 specified in the application and upon approval by the commission
560 of an application for the permit, the new permitholder shall be
561 authorized to operate a thoroughbred horse facility anywhere in
562 the same county in which the escheated permit was authorized to
563 be operated, notwithstanding the provisions of s. 550.054(2)
564 relating to mileage limitations.
565 Section 10. Section 838.12, Florida Statutes, is amended,
566 to read:
567 838.12 Bribery in athletic contests.—
568 (1) A person who Whoever gives, promises, offers or
569 conspires to give, promise or offer, to anyone who participates
570 or expects to participate in any professional or amateur game,
571 contest, match, race or sport; or to any umpire, referee, judge
572 or other official of such game, contest, match, race or sport;
573 or to any owner, manager, coach or trainer of, or to any
574 relative of, or to any person having any direct, indirect,
575 remote or possible connection with, any team, individual,
Page 23 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
576 participant or prospective participant in any such professional
577 or amateur game, contest, match, race or sport, or the officials
578 aforesaid, any bribe, money, goods, present, reward or any
579 valuable thing whatsoever, or any promise, contract or agreement
580 whatsoever, with intent to influence him or her or them to lose
581 or cause to be lost any game, contest, match, race or sport, or
582 to limit his or her or their or any person's or any team's
583 margin of victory in any game, contest, match, race, or sport,
584 or to fix or throw any game, contest, match, race or sport,
585 commits shall be guilty of a felony of the third degree,
586 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
587 (2) Any participant or prospective participant in any
588 professional or amateur game, contest, match, race or sport; or
589 any umpire, referee, judge or other official of such game,
590 contest, match, race or sport; or any owner, manager, coach or
591 trainer of, or any relative of, or any person having any direct,
592 indirect, remote or possible connection with, any team,
593 individual, participant or prospective participant in any such
594 professional or amateur game, contest, match, race or sport, or
595 the officials aforesaid; who in any way solicits, receives or
596 accepts, or agrees to receive or accept, or who conspires to
597 receive or accept, any bribe, money, goods, present, reward or
598 any valuable thing whatsoever, or any promise, contract or
599 agreement whatsoever, with intent to lose or cause to be lost
600 any game, contest, match, race or sport, or to limit his, her,
Page 24 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
601 their or any person's or any team's margin of victory in any
602 game, contest, match, race or sport, or to fix or throw any
603 game, contest, match, race or sport, commits shall be guilty of
604 a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s.
605 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
606 (3) A person who stakes, bets, or wagers any money or
607 other thing of value upon the result of any professional or
608 amateur game, contest, match, race, or sport with knowledge that
609 the results of such professional or amateur game, contest,
610 match, race, or sport are prearranged or predetermined as
611 described in subsection (1) or subsection (2) commits a felony
612 of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s.
613 775.083, or s. 775.084.
614 Section 11. Section 849.01, Florida Statutes, is amended
615 to read:
616 849.01 Keeping gambling houses, etc.—A person who Whoever
617 by herself or himself, her or his servant, clerk or agent, or in
618 any other manner has, keeps, exercises or maintains a gaming
619 table or room, or gaming implements or apparatus, or house,
620 booth, tent, shelter or other place for the purpose of gaming or
621 gambling or in any place of which she or he may directly or
622 indirectly have charge, control or management, either
623 exclusively or with others, procures, suffers or permits any
624 person to play for money or other valuable thing at any game
625 whatever, whether heretofore prohibited or not, commits a felony
Page 25 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
626 misdemeanor of the third second degree, punishable as provided
627 in s. 775.082, or s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
628 Section 12. Section 849.02, Florida Statutes, is amended
629 to read:
630 849.02 Agents or employees of keeper of gambling house.—A
631 person who Whoever acts as servant, clerk, agent, or employee of
632 any person in the violation of s. 849.01 commits:
633 (1) For a first offense, a misdemeanor of the first
634 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
635 (2) For a second offense, a felony of the third degree,
636 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
637 (3) For a third or subsequent offense, a felony of the
638 second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083,
639 or s. 775.084 shall be punished in the manner and to the extent
640 therein mentioned.
641 Section 13. Section 849.021, Florida Statutes, is created
642 to read:
643 849.021 Government employee misconduct.—
644 (1) As used in this section, the term:
645 (a) "Government employee" means any person employed by, or
646 acting on behalf of the state or any political subdivision
647 thereof.
648 (b) "Political subdivision" means a county, municipality,
649 department, commission, district, board, or other public body,
650 whether corporate or otherwise, created by or under state law.
Page 26 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
651 (2) Any government employee who knowingly certifies,
652 licenses, approves, aids, facilitates, or conceals the operation
653 of a gambling house in violation of s. 849.01, commits:
654 (a) For a first offense, a felony of the third degree,
655 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
656 (b) For a second or subsequent offense, a felony of the
657 second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083,
658 or s. 775.084.
659 (3) This section does not apply to any person who is
660 acting in the scope of his or her employment and, in good faith,
661 reports suspected violations of chapter 849 to law enforcement
662 or regulatory agencies.
663 Section 14. Section 849.023, Florida Statutes, is created
664 to read:
665 849.023 Licensure disqualifying offenses; corporate
666 shielding prohibited.—
667 (1) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
668 (a) "Controlling person" means:
669 1. A corporate officer or director, or, if a limited
670 liability company, manager of the licensee or applicant for a
671 license;
672 2. A general partner, member, or owner of more than 5
673 percent of any equity interest, direct or indirect, in the
674 licensee or applicant; or
675 3. An owner of any interest in the licensee or applicant,
Page 27 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
676 including any immediate family member of the owner, or holder of
677 any debt, mortgage, contract, or concession from the licensee or
678 applicant, who by virtue thereof is able to control the business
679 of the licensee or applicant.
680 (b) "Conviction" means a determination of guilt which is
681 the result of a plea or trial, regardless of whether
682 adjudication is withheld or a plea of nolo contendere is
683 entered.
684 (c) "License" has the same meaning as in s. 120.52 and is
685 issued by:
686 1. The Department of Business and Professional Regulation,
687 pursuant to chapter 509, chapter 561, chapter 562, chapter 563,
688 chapter 564, chapter 565, chapter 567, chapter 568, or chapter
689 569;
690 2. The Florida Gaming Control Commission pursuant to
691 chapter 550, chapter 551, or s. 849.086; or
692 3. The Office of Financial Regulation pursuant to chapter
693 560.
694 (d) "Licensee" means a holder of a license.
695 (e) "Owner" means a sole member or owner of 100 percent of
696 any equity interest, direct or indirect, in the licensee or
697 applicant.
698 (2) PENALTIES.—
699 (a)1. Pursuant to s. 120.60(6) and notwithstanding any
700 other provision of law specified in subsection (1), a violation
Page 28 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
701 of s. 849.01, s. 849.03, or s. 849.15 is deemed to constitute an
702 immediate and serious danger to the public health, safety, and
703 welfare, and the Department of Business and Professional
704 Regulation, the Florida Gaming Control Commission, or the Office
705 of Financial Regulation, respectively, may summarily suspend the
706 license of any person convicted of a violation of s. 849.01, s.
707 849.03, or s. 849.15, regardless of adjudication, or any
708 business entity if its controlling person or sole owner is
709 convicted of a violation of s. 849.01, s. 849.03, or s. 849.15,
710 regardless of adjudication.
711 2. In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a
712 licensee or an applicant, may have a license revoked or any
713 application thereof denied or not reissued, if the licensee or
714 applicant, the controlling person of the licensee or applicant,
715 or the sole owner of the licensee or applicant is convicted of a
716 violation of s. 849.01, s. 849.03, or s. 849.15, regardless of
717 adjudication.
718 3.a. Notwithstanding subparagraph 2., a licensee or
719 applicant may retain, apply for, and be reissued a license if
720 the license-issuing agency specified in paragraph (1)(c) finds
721 that such licensee has removed a controlling person from the
722 business.
723 b. Notwithstanding this paragraph, any licensee is subject
724 to a fine up to $75,000 for any conviction of a violation of s.
725 849.01, s. 849.03, or s. 849.15, regardless of adjudication.
Page 29 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
726
727 Section 15. Section 849.03, Florida Statutes, is amended
728 to read:
729 849.03 Renting house for gambling purposes.—A person who
730 Whoever, whether as owner or agent, knowingly rents to another a
731 house, room, booth, tent, shelter or place for the purpose of
732 gaming commits:
733 (1) For a first offense, a felony of the third degree,
734 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084
735 shall be punished in the manner and to the extent mentioned in
736 s. 849.01.
737 (2) For a second or subsequent offense, a felony of the
738 second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083,
739 or s. 775.084.
740 Section 16. Section 849.08, Florida Statutes, is amended
741 to read:
742 849.08 Gambling.—
743 (1) As used in this section, the term:
744 (a) "Illegal gambling" means any criminal violation of
745 chapter 546, chapter 550, or chapter 551, or this chapter that
746 occurs at any business, establishment, premises, or other
747 location.
748 (b) "Internet gambling" means to play or engage in any
749 game in which money or other thing of value is awarded based on
750 chance, regardless of any application of skill, that is
Page 30 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
751 available on the Internet and accessible on a mobile device,
752 computer terminal, or other similar access device and simulates
753 casino-style gaming, including, but not limited to, slot
754 machines, video poker, and table games.
755 (c) "Internet sports wagering" means to use a platform
756 that is available on the Internet and accessible on a mobile
757 device, computer terminal, or other similar access device to
758 stake, bet, or wager any money or other thing of value upon the
759 result of any trial or contest of skill, speed, power, or
760 endurance of human or beast. The term does not include fantasy
761 sports contests as defined in s. 849.0932 or any activity
762 conducted pursuant to chapter 550.
763 (2) A person who Whoever plays or engages in Internet
764 gambling or any game at cards, keno, roulette, faro or other
765 game of chance, at any place, by any device whatever, for money
766 or other thing of value, commits shall be guilty of a
767 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s.
768 775.082 or s. 775.083.
769 (3) A person who plays or engages in Internet sports
770 wagering commits:
771 (a) For a first offense, a misdemeanor of the second
772 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
773 (b) For a second or subsequent offense, a misdemeanor of
774 the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s.
775 775.083.
Page 31 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
776 (4) A person who operates, conducts, or promotes illegal
777 gambling, Internet gambling or Internet sports wagering, or
778 receives in any manner whatsoever any money or other thing of
779 value offered for the purpose of illegal gambling, Internet
780 gambling or Internet sports wagering, or who knowingly becomes
781 the custodian or depositary of any money or other thing of value
782 so offered, or who aids, assists, abets, or influences in any
783 manner in any of such acts commits a felony of the third degree,
784 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
785 (5) This section does not apply to participation in, or
786 the conduct of, any gaming activities authorized under s.
787 285.710(13) and conducted pursuant to a gaming compact ratified
788 and approved under s. 285.710(3), or any gaming activities
789 authorized under chapter 550.
790 Section 17. Paragraph (e) is added to subsection (12) of
791 section 849.086, Florida Statutes, to read:
792 849.086 Cardrooms authorized.—
793 (12) PROHIBITED ACTIVITIES.—
794 (e) A person who, by physical tampering or by use of any
795 object, instrument, or device, whether mechanical, electrical,
796 magnetic, or involving other means, manipulates or attempts to
797 manipulate playing cards for the purpose of affecting the
798 outcome or payoff of a card game in a licensed cardroom, or
799 otherwise manipulates or attempts to manipulate the outcome or
800 payoff of such a card game, commits a felony of the third
Page 32 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
801 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s.
802 775.084.
803 Section 18. Section 849.0932, Florida Statutes, is created
804 to read:
805 849.0932 Fantasy sports contests; conditions for conduct.—
806 (1) As used in this section, the term "fantasy sports
807 contest" means a contest in which a participant pays an entry
808 fee and manages a fantasy or simulation sports team composed of
809 athletes from a professional sports organization with the
810 opportunity to win a cash prize. The term includes a simulation
811 sports game.
812 (2) Fantasy sports contests must meet all of the following
813 requirements:
814 (a) Prizes and awards for the winning participants are
815 established and disclosed to contest participants before entry.
816 (b) All winning outcomes reflect the relative knowledge
817 and skill of the fantasy sports contest participant.
818 (c) All winning outcomes are determined predominantly by
819 accumulated statistical results of the performance of more than
820 one individual.
821 (d) A winning outcome may not be based on:
822 1. The score, point spread, or performance of a team or
823 combination of teams.
824 2. The single performance of an individual in a single
825 event or a pari-mutuel event, as the term "pari-mutuel" is
Page 33 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
826 defined in s. 550.002 as of January 1, 2026.
827 3. A game of poker or other card game.
828 4. The performance of participants in collegiate, high
829 school, or youth sporting events.
830 (e) Casino graphics, themes, or titles, including, but not
831 limited to, depictions of slot machine-style symbols, cards,
832 dice, craps, roulette, or lotto, are not displayed or depicted.
833 (3)(a) A violation of this section is punishable by a fine
834 of $1,000 in addition to civil and criminal penalties.
835 (b) An operator or owner of any website, platform, or
836 application that offers fantasy sports contests in violation of
837 this section is punishable by a fine of up to $100,000 per
838 violation.
839 (4) The Florida Gaming Control Commission shall
840 investigate and refer violations of this section for
841 prosecution. The Attorney General or state attorney may also
842 institute proceedings to enjoin any person found to be violating
843 this section.
844 (5)(a) A person who willfully and knowingly violates any
845 provision of this section commits a misdemeanor of the first
846 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
847 (b) An operator or owner of any website, platform, or
848 application that offers fantasy sports contests in violation of
849 this section commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as
850 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
Page 34 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
851 Section 19. Section 849.11, Florida Statutes, is amended
852 to read:
853 849.11 Plays at games of chance by lot.—
854 (1) A person who Whoever sets up, promotes or plays in
855 person or in any other manner, including, but not limited to, by
856 the use, at least in part, of the Internet, at any game of
857 chance by lot or with dice, cards, numbers, hazards or any other
858 gambling device whatever for, or for the disposal of money or
859 other thing of value or under the pretext of a sale, gift or
860 delivery thereof, or for any right, share or interest therein,
861 commits shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree,
862 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
863 (2) A person who sets up, operates, conducts, promotes, or
864 receives in any manner whatsoever any money or other thing of
865 value offered for the purpose of playing at any game of chance
866 by lot in violation of subsection (1), or who knowingly becomes
867 the custodian or depositary of any money or other thing of value
868 so offered, or who aids, assists, abets, or influences in any
869 manner in any of such acts, commits a felony of the third
870 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s.
871 775.084.
872 Section 20. Section 849.13, Florida Statutes, is amended
873 to read:
874 849.13 Punishment on Second or subsequent offense in
875 connection with lotteries conviction.—A person who commits a
Page 35 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
876 second or subsequent violation of the same Whoever, after being
877 convicted of an offense forbidden by law in connection with
878 lotteries for which there is no penalty specified for a second
879 or subsequent offense, shall have the offense reclassified to an
880 offense of the next higher degree, commits the like offense,
881 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable
882 as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. For purposes of
883 sentencing under chapter 921, a felony offense that is
884 reclassified under this section is ranked one level above the
885 ranking under s. 921.0022 or s. 921.0023 of the felony offense
886 committed.
887 Section 21. Section 849.14, Florida Statutes, is amended
888 to read:
889 849.14 Unlawful to bet on result of trial or contest of
890 skill, etc.—A person who:
891 (1) Whoever Stakes, bets, or wagers any money or other
892 thing of value upon the result of any trial or contest of skill,
893 speed or power or endurance of human or beast;
894 (2) , or whoever Receives in any manner whatsoever any
895 money or other thing of value staked, bet, or wagered, or
896 offered for the purpose of being staked, bet, or wagered, by or
897 for any other person upon any such result;
898 (3) , or whoever Knowingly becomes the custodian or
899 depositary of any money or other thing of value so staked, bet,
900 or wagered upon any such result;, or
Page 36 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
901 (4) whoever Aids, or assists, or abets, or influences in
902 any manner in any of such acts,
903
904 all of which are hereby forbidden, commits a felony of the third
905 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, or s. 775.083, or
906 s. 775.084.
907 Section 22. Section 849.142, Florida Statutes, is
908 repealed.
909 Section 23. Section 849.15, Florida Statutes, is amended
910 to read:
911 849.15 Manufacture, sale, possession, etc., of slot
912 machines or devices prohibited.—
913 (1) As used in this section, the term:
914 (a) "Conviction" means a determination of guilt that is
915 the result of a plea or a trial, regardless of whether
916 adjudication is withheld or a plea of nolo contendere is
917 entered.
918 (b) "Part thereof" means any equipment, subassembly, or
919 other part of a slot machine or device, whether attached to the
920 slot machine or device or separate therefrom, that was used,
921 attempted to be used, or intended to be used in connection with
922 the play or operation of the slot machine or device.
923 (c) "Person of authority" means a person who, at any
924 business, establishment, premises, or other location at which a
925 slot machine or device is offered for play:
Page 37 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
926 1. Has actual authority to act on behalf of the business,
927 establishment, premises, or other location; or
928 2. Is an officer, director, or managing member of the
929 business, establishment, premises, or other location.
930 (2)(1) It is unlawful:
931 (a) To manufacture, own, store, keep, possess, sell, rent,
932 lease, let on shares, lend or give away, transport, or expose
933 for sale or lease, or to offer to sell, rent, lease, let on
934 shares, lend or give away, or permit the operation of, or for
935 any person to permit to be placed, maintained, or used or kept
936 in any room, space, or building owned, leased or occupied by the
937 person or under the person's management or control, any slot
938 machine or device or any part thereof; or
939 (b) To make or to permit to be made with any person any
940 agreement with reference to any slot machine or device, pursuant
941 to which the user thereof, as a result of any element of chance
942 or other outcome unpredictable to him or her, may become
943 entitled to receive any money, credit, allowance, or thing of
944 value or additional chance or right to use such machine or
945 device, or to receive any check, slug, token or memorandum
946 entitling the holder to receive any money, credit, allowance or
947 thing of value.
948 (3)(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c), a
949 person who violates subsection (2) commits a misdemeanor of the
950 first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s.
Page 38 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
951 775.083.
952 (b) A person commits a felony of the third degree,
953 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084,
954 if he or she violates subsection (2) and:
955 1. Was a person of authority at the time of the violation;
956 or
957 2. Has one prior conviction for a violation of subsection
958 (2).
959 (c) A person commits a felony of the second degree,
960 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084,
961 if he or she violates subsection (2) and:
962 1.a. Was a person of authority at the time of the
963 violation; and
964 b. The violation involves five or more slot machines or
965 devices; or
966 2. Has two or more prior convictions for a violation of
967 subsection (2).
968 (4)(2) Pursuant to section 2 of that chapter of the
969 Congress of the United States entitled "An act to prohibit
970 transportation of gaming devices in interstate and foreign
971 commerce," approved January 2, 1951, being ch. 1194, 64 Stat.
972 1134, and also designated as 15 U.S.C. ss. 1171-1177, the State
973 of Florida, acting by and through the duly elected and qualified
974 members of its Legislature, does hereby in this section, and in
975 accordance with and in compliance with the provisions of section
Page 39 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
976 2 of such chapter of Congress, declare and proclaim that any
977 county of the State of Florida within which slot machine gaming
978 is authorized pursuant to chapter 551 is exempt from the
979 provisions of section 2 of that chapter of the Congress of the
980 United States entitled "An act to prohibit transportation of
981 gaming devices in interstate and foreign commerce," designated
982 as 15 U.S.C. ss. 1171-1177, approved January 2, 1951. All
983 shipments of gaming devices, including slot machines, into any
984 county of this state within which slot machine gaming is
985 authorized pursuant to chapter 551 and the registering,
986 recording, and labeling of which have been duly performed by the
987 manufacturer or distributor thereof in accordance with sections
988 3 and 4 of that chapter of the Congress of the United States
989 entitled "An act to prohibit transportation of gaming devices in
990 interstate and foreign commerce," approved January 2, 1951,
991 being ch. 1194, 64 Stat. 1134, and also designated as 15 U.S.C.
992 ss. 1171-1177, shall be deemed legal shipments thereof into this
993 state provided the destination of such shipments is an eligible
994 facility as defined in s. 551.102 or the facility of a slot
995 machine manufacturer or slot machine distributor as provided in
996 s. 551.109(2)(a).
997 Section 24. Section 849.155, Florida Statutes, is created
998 to read:
999 849.155 Trafficking in slot machines, devices, or parts.—A
1000 person who knowingly sells, purchases, manufactures, transports,
Page 40 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1001 delivers, or brings into this state more than 15 slot machines
1002 or devices or any part thereof commits a felony of the first
1003 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s.
1004 775.084. As used in this section, the term "part thereof" has
1005 the same meaning as in s. 849.15. If the quantity of slot
1006 machines or devices or any part thereof involved is:
1007 (1) More than 15 slot machines or devices or any part
1008 thereof, but less than 25 slot machines or devices or any part
1009 thereof, such person must be fined $100,000.
1010 (2) Twenty-five slot machines or devices or any part
1011 thereof or more, but less than 50 slot machines or devices or
1012 any part thereof, such person must be fined $250,000.
1013 (3) Fifty slot machines or devices or any part thereof or
1014 more, such person must be fined $500,000.
1015
1016 Notwithstanding any other law, all fines imposed and collected
1017 pursuant to this section must be deposited into the Pari-mutuel
1018 Wagering Trust Fund and may be used for the enforcement of
1019 chapters 546, 550, 551, and this chapter by the Florida Gaming
1020 Control Commission.
1021 Section 25. Section 849.157, Florida Statutes, is created
1022 to read:
1023 849.157 Making a false or misleading statement regarding
1024 the legality of slot machines or devices to facilitate sale.—
1025 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), a person who
Page 41 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1026 knowingly and willfully makes a materially false or misleading
1027 statement or who knowingly and willfully disseminates false or
1028 misleading information regarding the legality of a slot machine
1029 or device for the purpose of facilitating the sale or delivery
1030 of a slot machine or device for any money or other valuable
1031 consideration commits a felony of the third degree, punishable
1032 as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
1033 (2) A person who violates subsection (1), when such a
1034 violation involves the sale or delivery, or attempted sale or
1035 delivery, of five or more slot machines or devices commits a
1036 felony of the second degree, punishable as provided in s.
1037 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
1038 Section 26. Section 849.181, Florida Statutes, is created
1039 to read:
1040 849.181 Destruction of Excess Machines.—
1041 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to protect the
1042 public health, safety, and welfare of the residents of the state
1043 by removing slot machines or devices within the meaning of s.
1044 849.16 from public circulation and preventing the warehousing of
1045 large quantities of such slot machines or devices.
1046 (2) Definitions. As used in this section, the term:
1047 (a) "Criminal justice agency" has the same meaning as
1048 provided in s. 943.045.
1049 (b) "Excess slot machines" means more than five slot
1050 machines seized during an investigation.
Page 42 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1051 (c) "Slot machine" has the same meaning as the term "slot
1052 machine or device" provided in s. 849.16 and includes the
1053 definition of the term "part thereof" as provided in s. 849.15.
1054 (3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a criminal
1055 justice agency having custody of excess slot machines may
1056 destroy such excess slot machines during the pendency of any
1057 related legal proceedings or ongoing criminal investigations,
1058 provided that such criminal justice agency:
1059 (a) Retains at least five slot machines seized during an
1060 investigation until such time as the slot machines may be
1061 destroyed as provided in s. 849.18;
1062 (b) Notifies the appropriate United States Attorney or
1063 assistant United States Attorney, the responsible state or local
1064 prosecutor, or a criminal justice agency conducting a criminal
1065 investigation, that the excess slot machines will be destroyed
1066 after 60 days from the date notice is provided, unless the
1067 entity receiving the notice under this paragraph requests the
1068 criminal justice agency in writing not to destroy the excess
1069 slot machines;
1070 (c) Photographs and takes a video recording of each excess
1071 slot machine prior to its destruction to serve as evidentiary
1072 exhibits for use at trial. Any photograph or video recording
1073 shall include a written description of the name of the person
1074 such slot machine was taken from, the location where the slot
1075 machine was located, the name of the investigating law
Page 43 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1076 enforcement officer, the date the photograph or video recording
1077 was taken, and the name of the photographer or videographer.
1078 Such writing shall be made under oath by the investigating law
1079 enforcement officer, and the photograph and video recording
1080 shall be authenticated by the photographer's or videographer's
1081 signature;
1082 (d) Destroys each excess slot machine in the presence of a
1083 law enforcement officer, who shall create written sworn
1084 documentation of the date, time, location, and number of excess
1085 slot machines destroyed; and
1086 (e) Maintains such written sworn documentation created by
1087 the witnessing law enforcement officer under paragraph (d) as
1088 required under s. 119.021.
1089 (4) In any prosecution for a violation of this chapter, a
1090 photograph and video recording of an excess slot machine
1091 captured and documented pursuant to paragraph (c) may be deemed
1092 competent evidence and may be admissible in the prosecution to
1093 the same extent as if such excess slot machine were physically
1094 introduced as evidence.
1095 (5) If any provision of this section or its application to
1096 any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does
1097 not affect other provisions or applications of this section or
1098 chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision
1099 or application, and to this end, the provisions of this section
1100 are severable.
Page 44 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1101 Section 27. Section 849.23, Florida Statutes, is repealed.
1102 Section 28. Section 849.47, Florida Statutes, is created
1103 to read:
1104 849.47 Transporting or procuring the transportation of
1105 persons to facilitate illegal gambling.—
1106 (1) As used in this section, the term "illegal gambling"
1107 means any criminal violation of chapter 546, chapter 550, or
1108 chapter 551, or this chapter that occurs at any business,
1109 establishment, premises, or other location.
1110 (2) Except as provided in subsection (3), a person who
1111 knowingly and willfully transports, or procures the
1112 transportation of, five or more other persons into or within
1113 this state when he or she knows or reasonably should know that
1114 such transportation is for the purpose of facilitating illegal
1115 gambling commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable
1116 as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
1117 (3)(a) A person who transports, or procures the
1118 transportation of, a minor or a person 65 years of age or older
1119 in violation of subsection (2) commits a felony of the third
1120 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s.
1121 775.084.
1122 (b) A person who transports, or procures the
1123 transportation of, 12 or more persons in violation of subsection
1124 (2) commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided
1125 in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
Page 45 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1126 (c) A person who commits a second or subsequent violation
1127 of subsection (2) within 2 years from the date of the
1128 conviction, regardless of adjudication, commits a felony of the
1129 third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083,
1130 or s. 775.084.
1131 Section 29. Section 849.48, Florida Statutes, is created
1132 to read:
1133 849.48 Gambling or gaming advertisements; prohibited.—
1134 (1) As used in this section, the term "illegal gambling"
1135 means any criminal violation of this chapter, chapter 546,
1136 chapter 550, or chapter 551 which occurs at any business,
1137 establishment, premises, or other location.
1138 (2)(a) Except as otherwise specifically authorized by law,
1139 a person may not knowingly and intentionally make, publish,
1140 disseminate, circulate, or place before the public, or cause,
1141 directly or indirectly, to be made, published, disseminated,
1142 circulated, or placed before the public in this state, in any
1143 manner, whether in person or by the use, at least in part, of
1144 the Internet, any advertisement, circular, bill, poster,
1145 pamphlet, list, schedule, announcement, or notice for the
1146 purpose of promoting or facilitating illegal gambling.
1147 (b) Except as otherwise specifically authorized by law, a
1148 person may not set up any type or plate for any type of
1149 advertisement, circular, bill, poster, pamphlet, list, schedule,
1150 announcement, or notice when he or she knows or reasonably
Page 46 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1151 should know that such material will be used for the purpose of
1152 promoting or facilitating illegal gambling.
1153 (c) A person who violates this subsection commits:
1154 1. For a first offense, a misdemeanor of the first degree,
1155 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
1156 2. For a second or subsequent offense, a felony of the
1157 third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083,
1158 or s. 775.084.
1159 (3) This section does not prohibit the printing or
1160 producing of any advertisement, circular, bill, poster,
1161 pamphlet, list, schedule, announcement, or notice to be used for
1162 the purpose of promoting or facilitating gambling conducted in
1163 any other state or nation, outside of this state, where such
1164 gambling is not prohibited.
1165 Section 30. Section 849.49, Florida Statutes, is created
1166 to read:
1167 849.49 Preemption.—A county, municipality, or other
1168 political subdivision of the state may not enact or enforce any
1169 ordinance or local rule related to gaming, gambling, lotteries,
1170 or any activities described in s. 546.10 or this chapter which
1171 is less restrictive than state law.
1172 Section 31. Section 849.50, Florida Statutes, is created
1173 to read:
1174 849.50 Limited Gaming Device Surrender Program.—
1175 (1) The Legislature finds that illegal gaming operations
Page 47 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1176 not only undermine public trust, but also expose Floridians to
1177 organized criminal conduct, financial exploitation, and a host
1178 of other social harms. Furthermore, the Legislature finds that
1179 certain persons or entities owning, storing, keeping,
1180 possessing, transporting, permitting the operation of, or
1181 otherwise offering illegal gaming devices for play may have been
1182 misled regarding the legality of the otherwise illegal gaming
1183 devices. Therefore, the Legislature finds that there is a
1184 compelling state interest in creating a limited period of time
1185 in which otherwise illegal gaming devices may be surrendered
1186 without penalty to ensure such illegal gaming devices do not
1187 remain in circulation.
1188 (2) The Florida Gaming Control Commission shall organize,
1189 coordinate, and execute a statewide program in which individuals
1190 and organizations can handover, surrender, or otherwise disclaim
1191 any and all interest in any gaming devices, and convey such
1192 gaming devices to the commission. Such conveyance is irrevocable
1193 and final.
1194 (3) Any individual or organization that conveys a gaming
1195 device to the commission as described in this section, that is
1196 not already facing legal charges based on such possession, shall
1197 not face criminal prosecution for possession of such devices
1198 related to any of the devices conveyed to the commission.
1199 (4) The statewide program described in subsection (2)
1200 shall begin no less than 30 days before October 1, 2026, and end
Page 48 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1201 on October 1, 2026.
1202 (5) The commission shall advertise the program described
1203 in this section no less than 60 days before October 1, 2026.
1204 (6) No person or entity shall have any right, title, or
1205 interest in such property conveyed to the commission pursuant to
1206 this section.
1207 (7) The commission may execute memorandums of
1208 understanding with other criminal justice agencies to facilitate
1209 this section.
1210 Section 32. Subsection (2) of section 903.046, Florida
1211 Statutes, is amended to read:
1212 903.046 Purpose of and criteria for bail determination.—
1213 (2) When determining whether to release a defendant on
1214 bail or other conditions, and setting the amount of such what
1215 that bail or other those conditions may be, the court shall
1216 consider:
1217 (a) The nature and circumstances of the offense charged.
1218 (b) The weight of the evidence against the defendant.
1219 (c) The defendant's family ties, length of residence in
1220 the community, immigration status, employment history, financial
1221 resources, and mental condition.
1222 (d) The defendant's past and present conduct, including
1223 any record of convictions, previous flight to avoid prosecution,
1224 or failure to appear at court proceedings. However, any
1225 defendant who had failed to appear on the day of any required
Page 49 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1226 court proceeding in the case at issue, but who had later
1227 voluntarily appeared or surrendered, shall not be eligible for a
1228 recognizance bond; and any defendant who failed to appear on the
1229 day of any required court proceeding in the case at issue and
1230 who was later arrested shall not be eligible for a recognizance
1231 bond or for any form of bond which does not require a monetary
1232 undertaking or commitment equal to or greater than $2,000 or
1233 twice the value of the monetary commitment or undertaking of the
1234 original bond, whichever is greater. Notwithstanding anything in
1235 this section, the court has discretion in determining conditions
1236 of release if the defendant proves circumstances beyond his or
1237 her control for the failure to appear. This section may not be
1238 construed as imposing additional duties or obligations on a
1239 governmental entity related to monetary bonds.
1240 (e) The nature and probability of danger which the
1241 defendant's release poses to the community.
1242 (f) The source of funds used to post bail or procure an
1243 appearance bond, particularly whether the proffered funds, real
1244 property, property, or any proposed collateral or bond premium
1245 may be linked to or derived from the crime alleged to have been
1246 committed or from any other criminal or illicit activities. The
1247 burden of establishing the noninvolvement in or nonderivation
1248 from criminal or other illicit activity of such proffered funds,
1249 real property, property, or any proposed collateral or bond
1250 premium falls upon the defendant or other person proffering them
Page 50 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1251 to obtain the defendant's release.
1252 (g) Whether the defendant is already on release pending
1253 resolution of another criminal proceeding or on probation,
1254 parole, or other release pending completion of a sentence.
1255 (h) The street value of any drug or controlled substance
1256 connected to or involved in the criminal charge. It is the
1257 finding and intent of the Legislature that crimes involving
1258 drugs and other controlled substances are of serious social
1259 concern, that the flight of defendants to avoid prosecution is
1260 of similar serious social concern, and that frequently such
1261 defendants are able to post monetary bail using the proceeds of
1262 their unlawful enterprises to defeat the social utility of
1263 pretrial bail. Therefore, the courts should carefully consider
1264 the utility and necessity of substantial bail in relation to the
1265 street value of the drugs or controlled substances involved.
1266 (i) The amount of currency seized that is connected to or
1267 involved in a violation of chapter 546, chapter 550, chapter
1268 551, or chapter 849.
1269 (j)(i) The nature and probability of intimidation and
1270 danger to victims.
1271 (k)(j) Whether there is probable cause to believe that the
1272 defendant committed a new crime while on pretrial release.
1273 (l)(k) Any other facts that the court considers relevant.
1274 (m)(l) Whether the crime charged is a violation of chapter
1275 874 or alleged to be subject to enhanced punishment under
Page 51 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1276 chapter 874 or reclassification under s. 843.22. If any such
1277 violation is charged against a defendant or if the defendant is
1278 charged with a crime that is alleged to be subject to such
1279 enhancement or reclassification, he or she is not eligible for
1280 release on bail or surety bond until the first appearance on the
1281 case in order to ensure the full participation of the prosecutor
1282 and the protection of the public.
1283 (n)(m) Whether the defendant, other than a defendant whose
1284 only criminal charge is a misdemeanor offense under chapter 316,
1285 is required to register as a sexual offender under s. 943.0435
1286 or a sexual predator under s. 775.21; and, if so, he or she is
1287 not eligible for release on bail or surety bond until the first
1288 appearance on the case in order to ensure the full participation
1289 of the prosecutor and the protection of the public.
1290 Section 33. Paragraphs (a), (c), (e), and (g) of
1291 subsection (3) of section 921.0022, Florida Statutes, are
1292 amended to read:
1293 921.0022 Criminal Punishment Code; offense severity
1294 ranking chart.—
1295 (3) OFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART
1296 (a) LEVEL 1
1297
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
1298
Page 52 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
24.118(3)(a) 3rd Counterfeit or altered state
lottery ticket.
1299
104.0616(2) 3rd Unlawfully distributing,
ordering, requesting,
collecting, delivering, or
possessing vote-by-mail
ballots.
1300
212.054(2)(b) 3rd Discretionary sales surtax;
limitations, administration,
and collection.
1301
212.15(2)(b) 3rd Failure to remit sales taxes,
amount $1,000 or more but less
than $20,000.
1302
316.1935(1) 3rd Fleeing or attempting to elude
law enforcement officer.
1303
319.30(5) 3rd Sell, exchange, give away
certificate of title or
identification number plate.
1304
319.35(1)(a) 3rd Tamper, adjust, change, etc.,
Page 53 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
an odometer.
1305
320.26(1)(a) 3rd Counterfeit, manufacture, or
sell registration license
plates or validation stickers.
1306
322.212 3rd Possession of forged, stolen,
(1)(a)-(c) counterfeit, or unlawfully
issued driver license;
possession of simulated
identification.
1307
322.212(4) 3rd Supply or aid in supplying
unauthorized driver license or
identification card.
1308
322.212(5)(a) 3rd False application for driver
license or identification card.
1309
414.39(3)(a) 3rd Fraudulent misappropriation of
public assistance funds by
employee/official, value more
than $200.
1310
443.071(1) 3rd False statement or
Page 54 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
representation to obtain or
increase reemployment
assistance benefits.
1311
509.151(1) 3rd Defraud an innkeeper, food or
lodging value $1,000 or more.
1312
517.302(1) 3rd Violation of the Florida
Securities and Investor
Protection Act.
1313
713.69 3rd Tenant removes property upon
which lien has accrued, value
$1,000 or more.
1314
812.014(3)(c) 3rd Petit theft (3rd conviction);
theft of any property not
specified in subsection (2).
1315
815.04(4)(a) 3rd Offense against intellectual
property (i.e., computer
programs, data).
1316
817.52(2) 3rd Hiring with intent to defraud,
motor vehicle services.
Page 55 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1317
817.569(2) 3rd Use of public record or public
records information or
providing false information to
facilitate commission of a
felony.
1318
826.01 3rd Bigamy.
1319
828.122(3) 3rd Fighting or baiting animals.
1320
831.04(1) 3rd Any erasure, alteration, etc.,
of any replacement deed, map,
plat, or other document listed
in s. 92.28.
1321
831.31(1)(a) 3rd Sell, deliver, or possess
counterfeit controlled
substances, all but s.
893.03(5) drugs.
1322
832.041(1) 3rd Stopping payment with intent to
defraud $150 or more.
1323
832.05(2)(b) & 3rd Knowing, making, issuing
Page 56 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
(4)(c) worthless checks $150 or more
or obtaining property in return
for worthless check $150 or
more.
1324
838.15(2) 3rd Commercial bribe receiving.
1325
838.16 3rd Commercial bribery.
1326
843.18 3rd Fleeing by boat to elude a law
enforcement officer.
1327
847.011(1)(a) 3rd Sell, distribute, etc.,
obscene, lewd, etc., material
(2nd conviction).
1328
849.09(1)(a)-(d) 3rd Lottery; set up, promote, etc.,
or assist therein, conduct or
advertise drawing for prizes,
or dispose of property or money
by means of lottery.
1329
849.23 3rd Gambling-related machines;
"common offender" as to
property rights.
Page 57 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1330
849.25(2) 3rd Engaging in bookmaking.
1331
860.08 3rd Interfere with a railroad
signal.
1332
860.13(1)(a) 3rd Operate aircraft while under
the influence.
1333
893.13(2)(a)2. 3rd Purchase of cannabis.
1334
893.13(6)(a) 3rd Possession of cannabis (more
than 20 grams).
1335
934.03(1)(a) 3rd Intercepts, or procures any
other person to intercept, any
wire or oral communication.
1336
1337 (c) LEVEL 3
1338
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
1339
119.10(2)(b) 3rd Unlawful use of confidential
information from police
Page 58 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
reports.
1340
316.066 3rd Unlawfully obtaining or using
(3)(b)-(d) confidential crash reports.
1341
316.193(2)(b) 3rd Felony DUI, 3rd conviction.
1342
316.1935(2) 3rd Fleeing or attempting to elude
law enforcement officer in
patrol vehicle with siren and
lights activated.
1343
319.30(4) 3rd Possession by junkyard of motor
vehicle with identification
number plate removed.
1344
319.33(1)(a) 3rd Alter or forge any certificate
of title to a motor vehicle or
mobile home.
1345
319.33(1)(c) 3rd Procure or pass title on stolen
vehicle.
1346
319.33(4) 3rd With intent to defraud,
possess, sell, etc., a blank,
Page 59 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
forged, or unlawfully obtained
title or registration.
1347
327.35(2)(b) 3rd Felony BUI.
1348
328.05(2) 3rd Possess, sell, or counterfeit
fictitious, stolen, or
fraudulent titles or bills of
sale of vessels.
1349
328.07(4) 3rd Manufacture, exchange, or
possess vessel with counterfeit
or wrong ID number.
1350
376.302(5) 3rd Fraud related to reimbursement
for cleanup expenses under the
Inland Protection Trust Fund.
1351
379.2431 3rd Taking, disturbing, mutilating,
(1)(e)5. destroying, causing to be
destroyed, transferring,
selling, offering to sell,
molesting, or harassing marine
turtles, marine turtle eggs, or
marine turtle nests in
Page 60 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
violation of the Marine Turtle
Protection Act.
1352
379.2431 3rd Possessing any marine turtle
(1)(e)6. species or hatchling, or parts
thereof, or the nest of any
marine turtle species described
in the Marine Turtle Protection
Act.
1353
379.2431 3rd Soliciting to commit or
(1)(e)7. conspiring to commit a
violation of the Marine Turtle
Protection Act.
1354
400.9935(4)(a) 3rd Operating a clinic, or offering
or (b) services requiring licensure,
without a license.
1355
400.9935(4)(e) 3rd Filing a false license
application or other required
information or failing to
report information.
1356
440.1051(3) 3rd False report of workers'
Page 61 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
compensation fraud or
retaliation for making such a
report.
1357
501.001(2)(b) 2nd Tampers with a consumer product
or the container using
materially false/misleading
information.
1358
624.401(4)(a) 3rd Transacting insurance without a
certificate of authority.
1359
624.401(4)(b)1. 3rd Transacting insurance without a
certificate of authority;
premium collected less than
$20,000.
1360
626.902(1)(a) & 3rd Representing an unauthorized
(b) insurer.
1361
697.08 3rd Equity skimming.
1362
790.15(3) 3rd Person directs another to
discharge firearm from a
vehicle.
Page 62 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1363
794.053 3rd Lewd or lascivious written
solicitation of a person 16 or
17 years of age by a person 24
years of age or older.
1364
800.045(3) 3rd Possess, control, or
intentionally view any
photographic material, motion
picture, etc., which includes a
lewd or lascivious image.
1365
806.10(1) 3rd Maliciously injure, destroy, or
interfere with vehicles or
equipment used in firefighting.
1366
806.10(2) 3rd Interferes with or assaults
firefighter in performance of
duty.
1367
810.09(2)(b) 3rd Trespass on property other than
structure or conveyance armed
with firearm or dangerous
weapon.
1368
Page 63 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
810.145(2)(c) 3rd Digital voyeurism; 19 years of
age or older.
1369
812.014(2)(c)2. 3rd Grand theft; $5,000 or more but
less than $10,000.
1370
812.0145(2)(c) 3rd Theft from person 65 years of
age or older; $300 or more but
less than $10,000.
1371
812.015(8)(b) 3rd Retail theft with intent to
sell; conspires with others.
1372
812.081(2) 3rd Theft of a trade secret.
1373
815.04(4)(b) 2nd Computer offense devised to
defraud or obtain property.
1374
817.034(4)(a)3. 3rd Engages in scheme to defraud
(Florida Communications Fraud
Act), property valued at less
than $20,000.
1375
817.233 3rd Burning to defraud insurer.
1376
Page 64 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
817.234 3rd Unlawful solicitation of
(8)(b) & (c) persons involved in motor
vehicle accidents.
1377
817.234(11)(a) 3rd Insurance fraud; property value
less than $20,000.
1378
817.236 3rd Filing a false motor vehicle
insurance application.
1379
817.2361 3rd Creating, marketing, or
presenting a false or
fraudulent motor vehicle
insurance card.
1380
817.413(2) 3rd Sale of used goods of $1,000 or
more as new.
1381
817.49(2)(b)1. 3rd Willful making of a false
report of a crime causing great
bodily harm, permanent
disfigurement, or permanent
disability.
1382
831.28(2)(a) 3rd Counterfeiting a payment
Page 65 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
instrument with intent to
defraud or possessing a
counterfeit payment instrument
with intent to defraud.
1383
831.29 2nd Possession of instruments for
counterfeiting driver licenses
or identification cards.
1384
836.13(2) 3rd Generating an altered sexual
depiction of an identifiable
person without consent.
1385
836.13(4) 3rd Promoting, or possessing with
intent to promote, an altered
sexual depiction of an
identifiable person without
consent.
1386
838.12(3) 3rd Betting on predetermined or
prearranged professional or
amateur game, contest, match,
race, or sport.
1387
838.021(3)(b) 3rd Threatens unlawful harm to
Page 66 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
public servant.
1388
847.01385 3rd Harmful communication to a
minor.
1389
849.01 3rd Keeping gambling house.
1390
849.02(2) 3rd Agents or employees of keeper
of gambling house.
1391
849.03(1) 3rd Renting house for gambling
purposes.
1392
849.086(12)(e) 3rd Tampering with cards or card
games.
1393
849.09(1)(a)-(d) 3rd Lottery; set up, promote, etc.,
or assist therein, conduct or
advertise drawing for prizes,
or dispose of property or money
by means of lottery.
1394
849.09(1)(e)-(k) 3rd Conducting unlawful lottery;
second or subsequent offense.
1395
Page 67 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
849.11(2) 3rd Offenses relating to games of
chance.
1396
849.14 3rd Betting on result of trial or
contest of skill, etc.
1397
849.15(3)(b) 3rd Manufacture, sale, or
possession of slot machine; by
person of authority or with
prior conviction.
1398
849.157(1) 3rd False or misleading statement
to facilitate sale of slot
machines or devices.
1399
849.25(2) 3rd Engaging in bookmaking.
1400
849.47(3)(a) & 3rd Transporting persons to
(b) facilitate illegal gambling;
minor, person 65 years of age
or older, or 12 or more
persons.
1401
860.15(3) 3rd Overcharging for repairs and
parts.
Page 68 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1402
870.01(2) 3rd Riot.
1403
870.01(4) 3rd Inciting a riot.
1404
893.13(1)(a)2. 3rd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cannabis (or other s.
893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1.,
(2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6.,
(2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9.,
(2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs).
1405
893.13(1)(d)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
s. 893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1.,
(2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6.,
(2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9.,
(2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs
within 1,000 feet of
university.
1406
893.13(1)(f)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
s. 893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1.,
(2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6.,
(2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9.,
(2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs
Page 69 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
within 1,000 feet of public
housing facility.
1407
893.13(4)(c) 3rd Use or hire of minor; deliver
to minor other controlled
substances.
1408
893.13(6)(a) 3rd Possession of any controlled
substance other than felony
possession of cannabis.
1409
893.13(7)(a)8. 3rd Withhold information from
practitioner regarding previous
receipt of or prescription for
a controlled substance.
1410
893.13(7)(a)9. 3rd Obtain or attempt to obtain
controlled substance by fraud,
forgery, misrepresentation,
etc.
1411
893.13(7)(a)10. 3rd Affix false or forged label to
package of controlled
substance.
1412
Page 70 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
893.13(7)(a)11. 3rd Furnish false or fraudulent
material information on any
document or record required by
chapter 893.
1413
893.13(8)(a)1. 3rd Knowingly assist a patient,
other person, or owner of an
animal in obtaining a
controlled substance through
deceptive, untrue, or
fraudulent representations in
or related to the
practitioner's practice.
1414
893.13(8)(a)2. 3rd Employ a trick or scheme in the
practitioner's practice to
assist a patient, other person,
or owner of an animal in
obtaining a controlled
substance.
1415
893.13(8)(a)3. 3rd Knowingly write a prescription
for a controlled substance for
a fictitious person.
1416
Page 71 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
893.13(8)(a)4. 3rd Write a prescription for a
controlled substance for a
patient, other person, or an
animal if the sole purpose of
writing the prescription is a
monetary benefit for the
practitioner.
1417
918.13(1) 3rd Tampering with or fabricating
physical evidence.
1418
944.47 3rd Introduce contraband to
(1)(a)1. & 2. correctional facility.
1419
944.47(1)(c) 2nd Possess contraband while upon
the grounds of a correctional
institution.
1420
985.721 3rd Escapes from a juvenile
facility (secure detention or
residential commitment
facility).
1421
1422 (e) LEVEL 5
1423
Page 72 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
1424
316.027(2)(a) 3rd Accidents involving personal
injuries other than serious
bodily injury, failure to stop;
leaving scene.
1425
316.1935(3)(a) 2nd Driving at high speed or with
wanton disregard for safety
while fleeing or attempting to
elude law enforcement officer
who is in a patrol vehicle with
siren and lights activated.
1426
316.80(2) 2nd Unlawful conveyance of fuel;
obtaining fuel fraudulently.
1427
322.34(6) 3rd Careless operation of motor
vehicle with suspended license,
resulting in death or serious
bodily injury.
1428
327.30(5)(a)2. 3rd Vessel accidents involving
personal injuries other than
Page 73 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
serious bodily injury; leaving
scene.
1429
365.172 2nd Misuse of emergency
(14)(b)2. communications system resulting
in death.
1430
379.365(2)(c)1. 3rd Violation of rules relating to:
willful molestation of stone
crab traps, lines, or buoys;
illegal bartering, trading, or
sale, conspiring or aiding in
such barter, trade, or sale, or
supplying, agreeing to supply,
aiding in supplying, or giving
away stone crab trap tags or
certificates; making, altering,
forging, counterfeiting, or
reproducing stone crab trap
tags; possession of forged,
counterfeit, or imitation stone
crab trap tags; and engaging in
the commercial harvest of stone
crabs while license is
suspended or revoked.
Page 74 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1431
379.367(4) 3rd Willful molestation of a
commercial harvester's spiny
lobster trap, line, or buoy.
1432
379.407(5)(b)3. 3rd Possession of 100 or more
undersized spiny lobsters.
1433
381.0041(11)(b) 3rd Donate blood, plasma, or organs
knowing HIV positive.
1434
440.10(1)(g) 2nd Failure to obtain workers'
compensation coverage.
1435
440.105(5) 2nd Unlawful solicitation for the
purpose of making workers'
compensation claims.
1436
440.381(2) 3rd Submission of false,
misleading, or incomplete
information with the purpose of
avoiding or reducing workers'
compensation premiums.
1437
624.401(4)(b)2. 2nd Transacting insurance without a
Page 75 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
certificate or authority;
premium collected $20,000 or
more but less than $100,000.
1438
626.902(1)(c) 2nd Representing an unauthorized
insurer; repeat offender.
1439
790.01(3) 3rd Unlawful carrying of a
concealed firearm.
1440
790.162 2nd Threat to throw or discharge
destructive device.
1441
790.163(1) 2nd False report of bomb,
explosive, weapon of mass
destruction, or use of firearms
in violent manner.
1442
790.221(1) 2nd Possession of short-barreled
shotgun or machine gun.
1443
790.23 2nd Felons in possession of
firearms, ammunition, or
electronic weapons or devices.
1444
Page 76 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
796.05(1) 2nd Live on earnings of a
prostitute; 1st offense.
1445
800.04(6)(c) 3rd Lewd or lascivious conduct;
offender less than 18 years of
age.
1446
800.04(7)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious exhibition;
offender 18 years of age or
older.
1447
806.111(1) 3rd Possess, manufacture, or
dispense fire bomb with intent
to damage any structure or
property.
1448
810.145(4) 3rd Commercial digital voyeurism
dissemination.
1449
810.145(7)(a) 2nd Digital voyeurism; 2nd or
subsequent offense.
1450
810.145(8)(a) 2nd Digital voyeurism; certain
minor victims.
1451
Page 77 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
812.014(2)(d)3. 2nd Grand theft, 2nd degree; theft
from 20 or more dwellings or
their unenclosed curtilage, or
any combination.
1452
812.0145(2)(b) 2nd Theft from person 65 years of
age or older; $10,000 or more
but less than $50,000.
1453
812.015 3rd Retail theft; property stolen
(8)(a) & (c)- is valued at $750 or more and
(e) one or more specified acts.
1454
812.015(8)(f) 3rd Retail theft; multiple thefts
within specified period.
1455
812.015(8)(g) 3rd Retail theft; committed with
specified number of other
persons.
1456
812.019(1) 2nd Stolen property; dealing in or
trafficking in.
1457
812.081(3) 2nd Trafficking in trade secrets.
1458
Page 78 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
812.131(2)(b) 3rd Robbery by sudden snatching.
1459
812.16(2) 3rd Owning, operating, or
conducting a chop shop.
1460
817.034(4)(a)2. 2nd Communications fraud, value
$20,000 to $50,000.
1461
817.234(11)(b) 2nd Insurance fraud; property value
$20,000 or more but less than
$100,000.
1462
817.2341(1), 3rd Filing false financial
(2)(a) & statements, making false
(3)(a) entries of material fact or
false statements regarding
property values relating to the
solvency of an insuring entity.
1463
817.568(2)(b) 2nd Fraudulent use of personal
identification information;
value of benefit, services
received, payment avoided, or
amount of injury or fraud,
$5,000 or more or use of
Page 79 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
personal identification
information of 10 or more
persons.
1464
817.611(2)(a) 2nd Traffic in or possess 5 to 14
counterfeit credit cards or
related documents.
1465
817.625(2)(b) 2nd Second or subsequent fraudulent
use of scanning device,
skimming device, or reencoder.
1466
825.1025(4) 3rd Lewd or lascivious exhibition
in the presence of an elderly
person or disabled adult.
1467
828.12(2) 3rd Tortures any animal with intent
to inflict intense pain,
serious physical injury, or
death.
1468
836.14(4) 2nd Person who willfully promotes
for financial gain a sexually
explicit image of an
identifiable person without
Page 80 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
consent.
1469
839.13(2)(b) 2nd Falsifying records of an
individual in the care and
custody of a state agency
involving great bodily harm or
death.
1470
843.01(1) 3rd Resist officer with violence to
person; resist arrest with
violence.
1471
847.0135(5)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious exhibition
using computer; offender 18
years or older.
1472
847.0137 3rd Transmission of pornography by
(2) & (3) electronic device or equipment.
1473
847.0138 3rd Transmission of material
(2) & (3) harmful to minors to a minor by
electronic device or equipment.
1474
849.02(3) 2nd Agents or employees of keeper
of gambling house, third or
Page 81 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
subsequent offense.
1475
849.03(2) 2nd Renting house for gambling
purposes; second or subsequent
offense.
1476
849.15(3)(c) 2nd Manufacture, sale, or
possession of slot machine; by
person of authority of five or
more machines or two or more
prior convictions.
1477
849.157(2) 2nd False or misleading statement
to facilitate sale of slot
machines or devices; five or
more machines.
1478
849.25(3) 2nd Bookmaking; second or
subsequent offense.
1479
874.05(1)(b) 2nd Encouraging or recruiting
another to join a criminal
gang; second or subsequent
offense.
1480
Page 82 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
874.05(2)(a) 2nd Encouraging or recruiting
person under 13 years of age to
join a criminal gang.
1481
893.13(1)(a)1. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine (or other s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.
drugs).
1482
893.13(1)(c)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cannabis (or other s.
893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1.,
(2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6.,
(2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9.,
(2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs)
within 1,000 feet of a child
care facility, school, or
state, county, or municipal
park or publicly owned
recreational facility or
community center.
1483
893.13(1)(d)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine (or other s.
Page 83 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.
drugs) within 1,000 feet of
university.
1484
893.13(1)(e)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cannabis or other drug
prohibited under s.
893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1.,
(2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6.,
(2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9.,
(2)(c)10., (3), or (4) within
1,000 feet of property used for
religious services or a
specified business site.
1485
893.13(1)(f)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine (or other s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
or (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.
drugs) within 1,000 feet of
public housing facility.
1486
893.13(4)(b) 2nd Use or hire of minor; deliver
to minor other controlled
Page 84 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
substance.
1487
893.1351(1) 3rd Ownership, lease, or rental for
trafficking in or manufacturing
of controlled substance.
1488
1489 (g) LEVEL 7
1490
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
1491
316.027(2)(c) 1st Accident involving death,
failure to stop; leaving scene.
1492
316.193(3)(c)2. 3rd DUI resulting in serious bodily
injury.
1493
316.1935(3)(b) 1st Causing serious bodily injury
or death to another person;
driving at high speed or with
wanton disregard for safety
while fleeing or attempting to
elude law enforcement officer
who is in a patrol vehicle with
siren and lights activated.
Page 85 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1494
327.35(3)(a)3.b. 3rd Vessel BUI resulting in serious
bodily injury.
1495
402.319(2) 2nd Misrepresentation and
negligence or intentional act
resulting in great bodily harm,
permanent disfiguration,
permanent disability, or death.
1496
409.920 3rd Medicaid provider fraud;
(2)(b)1.a. $10,000 or less.
1497
409.920 2nd Medicaid provider fraud; more
(2)(b)1.b. than $10,000, but less than
$50,000.
1498
456.065(2) 3rd Practicing a health care
profession without a license.
1499
456.065(2) 2nd Practicing a health care
profession without a license
which results in serious bodily
injury.
1500
Page 86 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
458.327(1) 3rd Practicing medicine without a
license.
1501
459.013(1) 3rd Practicing osteopathic medicine
without a license.
1502
460.411(1) 3rd Practicing chiropractic
medicine without a license.
1503
461.012(1) 3rd Practicing podiatric medicine
without a license.
1504
462.17 3rd Practicing naturopathy without
a license.
1505
463.015(1) 3rd Practicing optometry without a
license.
1506
464.016(1) 3rd Practicing nursing without a
license.
1507
465.015(2) 3rd Practicing pharmacy without a
license.
1508
466.026(1) 3rd Practicing dentistry or dental
Page 87 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
hygiene without a license.
1509
467.201 3rd Practicing midwifery without a
license.
1510
468.366 3rd Delivering respiratory care
services without a license.
1511
483.828(1) 3rd Practicing as clinical
laboratory personnel without a
license.
1512
483.901(7) 3rd Practicing medical physics
without a license.
1513
484.013(1)(c) 3rd Preparing or dispensing optical
devices without a prescription.
1514
484.053 3rd Dispensing hearing aids without
a license.
1515
494.0018(2) 1st Conviction of any violation of
chapter 494 in which the total
money and property unlawfully
obtained exceeded $50,000 and
Page 88 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
there were five or more
victims.
1516
560.123(8)(b)1. 3rd Failure to report currency or
payment instruments exceeding
$300 but less than $20,000 by a
money services business.
1517
560.125(5)(a) 3rd Money services business by
unauthorized person, currency
or payment instruments
exceeding $300 but less than
$20,000.
1518
655.50(10)(b)1. 3rd Failure to report financial
transactions exceeding $300 but
less than $20,000 by financial
institution.
1519
775.21(10)(a) 3rd Sexual predator; failure to
register; failure to renew
driver license or
identification card; other
registration violations.
1520
Page 89 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
775.21(10)(b) 3rd Sexual predator working where
children regularly congregate.
1521
775.21(10)(g) 3rd Failure to report or providing
false information about a
sexual predator; harbor or
conceal a sexual predator.
1522
782.051(3) 2nd Attempted felony murder of a
person by a person other than
the perpetrator or the
perpetrator of an attempted
felony.
1523
782.07(1) 2nd Killing of a human being by the
act, procurement, or culpable
negligence of another
(manslaughter).
1524
782.071 2nd Killing of a human being or
unborn child by the operation
of a motor vehicle in a
reckless manner (vehicular
homicide).
1525
Page 90 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
782.072 2nd Killing of a human being by the
operation of a vessel in a
reckless manner (vessel
homicide).
1526
784.045(1)(a)1. 2nd Aggravated battery;
intentionally causing great
bodily harm or disfigurement.
1527
784.045(1)(a)2. 2nd Aggravated battery; using
deadly weapon.
1528
784.045(1)(b) 2nd Aggravated battery; perpetrator
aware victim pregnant.
1529
784.048(4) 3rd Aggravated stalking; violation
of injunction or court order.
1530
784.048(7) 3rd Aggravated stalking; violation
of court order.
1531
784.07(2)(d) 1st Aggravated battery on law
enforcement officer.
1532
784.074(1)(a) 1st Aggravated battery on sexually
Page 91 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
violent predators facility
staff.
1533
784.08(2)(a) 1st Aggravated battery on a person
65 years of age or older.
1534
784.081(1) 1st Aggravated battery on specified
official or employee.
1535
784.082(1) 1st Aggravated battery by detained
person on visitor or other
detainee.
1536
784.083(1) 1st Aggravated battery on code
inspector.
1537
787.025(2)(b) 2nd Luring or enticing a child;
second or subsequent offense.
1538
787.025(2)(c) 2nd Luring or enticing a child with
a specified prior conviction.
1539
787.06(3)(a)2. 1st Human trafficking using
coercion for labor and services
of an adult.
Page 92 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1540
787.06(3)(e)2. 1st Human trafficking using
coercion for labor and services
by the transfer or transport of
an adult from outside Florida
to within the state.
1541
790.07(4) 1st Specified weapons violation
subsequent to previous
conviction of s. 790.07(1) or
(2).
1542
790.16(1) 1st Discharge of a machine gun
under specified circumstances.
1543
790.165(2) 2nd Manufacture, sell, possess, or
deliver hoax bomb.
1544
790.165(3) 2nd Possessing, displaying, or
threatening to use any hoax
bomb while committing or
attempting to commit a felony.
1545
790.166(3) 2nd Possessing, selling, using, or
attempting to use a hoax weapon
Page 93 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
of mass destruction.
1546
790.166(4) 2nd Possessing, displaying, or
threatening to use a hoax
weapon of mass destruction
while committing or attempting
to commit a felony.
1547
790.23 1st,PBL Possession of a firearm by a
person who qualifies for the
penalty enhancements provided
for in s. 874.04.
1548
794.08(4) 3rd Female genital mutilation;
consent by a parent, guardian,
or a person in custodial
authority to a victim younger
than 18 years of age.
1549
796.05(1) 1st Live on earnings of a
prostitute; 2nd offense.
1550
796.05(1) 1st Live on earnings of a
prostitute; 3rd and subsequent
offense.
Page 94 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1551
800.04(5)(c)1. 2nd Lewd or lascivious molestation;
victim younger than 12 years of
age; offender younger than 18
years of age.
1552
800.04(5)(c)2. 2nd Lewd or lascivious molestation;
victim 12 years of age or older
but younger than 16 years of
age; offender 18 years of age
or older.
1553
800.04(5)(e) 1st Lewd or lascivious molestation;
victim 12 years of age or older
but younger than 16 years;
offender 18 years or older;
prior conviction for specified
sex offense.
1554
806.01(2) 2nd Maliciously damage structure by
fire or explosive.
1555
810.02(3)(a) 2nd Burglary of occupied dwelling;
unarmed; no assault or battery.
1556
Page 95 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
810.02(3)(b) 2nd Burglary of unoccupied
dwelling; unarmed; no assault
or battery.
1557
810.02(3)(d) 2nd Burglary of occupied
conveyance; unarmed; no assault
or battery.
1558
810.02(3)(e) 2nd Burglary of authorized
emergency vehicle.
1559
812.014(2)(a)1. 1st Property stolen, valued at
$100,000 or more or a
semitrailer deployed by a law
enforcement officer; property
stolen while causing other
property damage; 1st degree
grand theft.
1560
812.014(2)(b)2. 2nd Property stolen, cargo valued
at less than $50,000, grand
theft in 2nd degree.
1561
812.014(2)(b)3. 2nd Property stolen, emergency
medical equipment; 2nd degree
Page 96 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
grand theft.
1562
812.014(2)(b)4. 2nd Property stolen, law
enforcement equipment from
authorized emergency vehicle.
1563
812.014(2)(g) 2nd Grand theft; second degree;
firearm with previous
conviction of s.
812.014(2)(c)5.
1564
812.0145(2)(a) 1st Theft from person 65 years of
age or older; $50,000 or more.
1565
812.019(2) 1st Stolen property; initiates,
organizes, plans, etc., the
theft of property and traffics
in stolen property.
1566
812.131(2)(a) 2nd Robbery by sudden snatching.
1567
812.133(2)(b) 1st Carjacking; no firearm, deadly
weapon, or other weapon.
1568
817.034(4)(a)1. 1st Communications fraud, value
Page 97 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
greater than $50,000.
1569
817.234(8)(a) 2nd Solicitation of motor vehicle
accident victims with intent to
defraud.
1570
817.234(9) 2nd Organizing, planning, or
participating in an intentional
motor vehicle collision.
1571
817.234(11)(c) 1st Insurance fraud; property value
$100,000 or more.
1572
817.2341 1st Making false entries of
(2)(b) & material fact or false
(3)(b) statements regarding property
values relating to the solvency
of an insuring entity which are
a significant cause of the
insolvency of that entity.
1573
817.418(2)(a) 3rd Offering for sale or
advertising personal protective
equipment with intent to
defraud.
Page 98 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1574
817.504(1)(a) 3rd Offering or advertising a
vaccine with intent to defraud.
1575
817.535(2)(a) 3rd Filing false lien or other
unauthorized document.
1576
817.611(2)(b) 2nd Traffic in or possess 15 to 49
counterfeit credit cards or
related documents.
1577
825.102(3)(b) 2nd Neglecting an elderly person or
disabled adult causing great
bodily harm, disability, or
disfigurement.
1578
825.103(3)(b) 2nd Exploiting an elderly person or
disabled adult and property is
valued at $10,000 or more, but
less than $50,000.
1579
827.03(2)(b) 2nd Neglect of a child causing
great bodily harm, disability,
or disfigurement.
1580
Page 99 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
827.04(3) 3rd Impregnation of a child under
16 years of age by person 21
years of age or older.
1581
827.071(2) & (3) 2nd Use or induce a child in a
sexual performance, or promote
or direct such performance.
1582
827.071(4) 2nd Possess with intent to promote
any photographic material,
motion picture, etc., which
includes child pornography.
1583
837.05(2) 3rd Giving false information about
alleged capital felony to a law
enforcement officer.
1584
838.015 2nd Bribery.
1585
838.016 2nd Unlawful compensation or reward
for official behavior.
1586
838.021(3)(a) 2nd Unlawful harm to a public
servant.
1587
Page 100 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
838.22 2nd Bid tampering.
1588
843.0855(2) 3rd Impersonation of a public
officer or employee.
1589
843.0855(3) 3rd Unlawful simulation of legal
process.
1590
843.0855(4) 3rd Intimidation of a public
officer or employee.
1591
847.0135(3) 3rd Solicitation of a child, via a
computer service, to commit an
unlawful sex act.
1592
847.0135(4) 2nd Traveling to meet a minor to
commit an unlawful sex act.
1593
849.155 1st Trafficking in slot machines or
devices or any part thereof.
1594
872.06 2nd Abuse of a dead human body.
1595
874.05(2)(b) 1st Encouraging or recruiting
person under 13 to join a
Page 101 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
criminal gang; second or
subsequent offense.
1596
874.10 1st,PBL Knowingly initiates, organizes,
plans, finances, directs,
manages, or supervises criminal
gang-related activity.
1597
893.13(1)(c)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine (or other drug
prohibited under s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.)
within 1,000 feet of a child
care facility, school, or
state, county, or municipal
park or publicly owned
recreational facility or
community center.
1598
893.13(1)(e)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine or other drug
prohibited under s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.,
Page 102 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
within 1,000 feet of property
used for religious services or
a specified business site.
1599
893.13(4)(a) 1st Use or hire of minor; deliver
to minor other controlled
substance.
1600
893.135(1)(a)1. 1st Trafficking in cannabis, more
than 25 lbs., less than 2,000
lbs.
1601
893.135 1st Trafficking in cocaine, more
(1)(b)1.a. than 28 grams, less than 200
grams.
1602
893.135 1st Trafficking in illegal drugs,
(1)(c)1.a. more than 4 grams, less than 14
grams.
1603
893.135 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone, 28
(1)(c)2.a. grams or more, less than 50
grams.
1604
893.135 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone, 50
Page 103 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
(1)(c)2.b. grams or more, less than 100
grams.
1605
893.135 1st Trafficking in oxycodone, 7
(1)(c)3.a. grams or more, less than 14
grams.
1606
893.135 1st Trafficking in oxycodone, 14
(1)(c)3.b. grams or more, less than 25
grams.
1607
893.135 1st Trafficking in fentanyl, 4
(1)(c)4.b.(I) grams or more, less than 14
grams.
1608
893.135 1st Trafficking in phencyclidine,
(1)(d)1.a. 28 grams or more, less than 200
grams.
1609
893.135(1)(e)1. 1st Trafficking in methaqualone,
200 grams or more, less than 5
kilograms.
1610
893.135(1)(f)1. 1st Trafficking in amphetamine, 14
grams or more, less than 28
Page 104 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
grams.
1611
893.135 1st Trafficking in flunitrazepam, 4
(1)(g)1.a. grams or more, less than 14
grams.
1612
893.135 1st Trafficking in gamma-
(1)(h)1.a. hydroxybutyric acid (GHB), 1
kilogram or more, less than 5
kilograms.
1613
893.135 1st Trafficking in 1,4-Butanediol,
(1)(j)1.a. 1 kilogram or more, less than 5
kilograms.
1614
893.135 1st Trafficking in Phenethylamines,
(1)(k)2.a. 10 grams or more, less than 200
grams.
1615
893.135 1st Trafficking in synthetic
(1)(m)2.a. cannabinoids, 280 grams or
more, less than 500 grams.
1616
893.135 1st Trafficking in synthetic
(1)(m)2.b. cannabinoids, 500 grams or
Page 105 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
more, less than 1,000 grams.
1617
893.135 1st Trafficking in n-benzyl
(1)(n)2.a. phenethylamines, 14 grams or
more, less than 100 grams.
1618
893.1351(2) 2nd Possession of place for
trafficking in or manufacturing
of controlled substance.
1619
896.101(5)(a) 3rd Money laundering, financial
transactions exceeding $300 but
less than $20,000.
1620
896.104(4)(a)1. 3rd Structuring transactions to
evade reporting or registration
requirements, financial
transactions exceeding $300 but
less than $20,000.
1621
943.0435(4)(c) 2nd Sexual offender vacating
permanent residence; failure to
comply with reporting
requirements.
1622
Page 106 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
943.0435(8) 2nd Sexual offender; remains in
state after indicating intent
to leave; failure to comply
with reporting requirements.
1623
943.0435(9)(a) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
comply with reporting
requirements.
1624
943.0435(13) 3rd Failure to report or providing
false information about a
sexual offender; harbor or
conceal a sexual offender.
1625
943.0435(14) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
report and reregister; failure
to respond to address
verification; providing false
registration information.
1626
944.607(9) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
comply with reporting
requirements.
1627
944.607(10)(a) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
Page 107 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
submit to the taking of a
digitized photograph.
1628
944.607(12) 3rd Failure to report or providing
false information about a
sexual offender; harbor or
conceal a sexual offender.
1629
944.607(13) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
report and reregister; failure
to respond to address
verification; providing false
registration information.
1630
985.4815(10) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
submit to the taking of a
digitized photograph.
1631
985.4815(12) 3rd Failure to report or providing
false information about a
sexual offender; harbor or
conceal a sexual offender.
1632
985.4815(13) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
report and reregister; failure
Page 108 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
to respond to address
verification; providing false
registration information.
1633
1634 Section 34. Subsection (5) of section 16.71, Florida
1635 Statutes, is amended to read:
1636 16.71 Florida Gaming Control Commission; creation;
1637 meetings; membership.—
1638 (5) INSPECTOR GENERAL.—The chair of the commission shall
1639 appoint an inspector general who shall perform the duties of an
1640 inspector general under s. 20.055.
1641 Section 35. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) and paragraph
1642 (a) of subsection (2) of section 772.102, Florida Statutes, are
1643 amended to read:
1644 772.102 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the term:
1645 (1) "Criminal activity" means to commit, to attempt to
1646 commit, to conspire to commit, or to solicit, coerce, or
1647 intimidate another person to commit:
1648 (a) Any crime that is chargeable by indictment or
1649 information under the following provisions:
1650 1. Section 210.18, relating to evasion of payment of
1651 cigarette taxes.
1652 2. Section 414.39, relating to public assistance fraud.
1653 3. Section 440.105 or s. 440.106, relating to workers'
1654 compensation.
Page 109 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1655 4. Part IV of chapter 501, relating to telemarketing.
1656 5. Chapter 517, relating to securities transactions.
1657 6. Section 550.235 or s. 550.3551, relating to dogracing
1658 and horseracing.
1659 7. Chapter 550, relating to jai alai frontons.
1660 8. Chapter 552, relating to the manufacture, distribution,
1661 and use of explosives.
1662 9. Chapter 562, relating to beverage law enforcement.
1663 10. Section 624.401, relating to transacting insurance
1664 without a certificate of authority, s. 624.437(4)(c)1., relating
1665 to operating an unauthorized multiple-employer welfare
1666 arrangement, or s. 626.902(1)(b), relating to representing or
1667 aiding an unauthorized insurer.
1668 11. Chapter 687, relating to interest and usurious
1669 practices.
1670 12. Section 721.08, s. 721.09, or s. 721.13, relating to
1671 real estate timeshare plans.
1672 13. Chapter 782, relating to homicide.
1673 14. Chapter 784, relating to assault and battery.
1674 15. Chapter 787, relating to kidnapping or human
1675 trafficking.
1676 16. Chapter 790, relating to weapons and firearms.
1677 17. Former s. 796.03, s. 796.04, s. 796.05, or s. 796.07,
1678 relating to prostitution.
1679 18. Chapter 806, relating to arson.
Page 110 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1680 19. Section 810.02(2)(c), relating to specified burglary
1681 of a dwelling or structure.
1682 20. Chapter 812, relating to theft, robbery, and related
1683 crimes.
1684 21. Chapter 815, relating to computer-related crimes.
1685 22. Chapter 817, relating to fraudulent practices, false
1686 pretenses, fraud generally, and credit card crimes.
1687 23. Section 827.071, relating to commercial sexual
1688 exploitation of children.
1689 24. Chapter 831, relating to forgery and counterfeiting.
1690 25. Chapter 832, relating to issuance of worthless checks
1691 and drafts.
1692 26. Section 836.05, relating to extortion.
1693 27. Chapter 837, relating to perjury.
1694 28. Chapter 838, relating to bribery and misuse of public
1695 office.
1696 29. Chapter 843, relating to obstruction of justice.
1697 30. Section 847.011, s. 847.012, s. 847.013, s. 847.06, or
1698 s. 847.07, relating to obscene literature and profanity.
1699 31. Section 849.09, s. 849.14, s. 849.15, s. 849.23, or s.
1700 849.25, relating to gambling.
1701 32. Chapter 893, relating to drug abuse prevention and
1702 control.
1703 33. Section 914.22 or s. 914.23, relating to witnesses,
1704 victims, or informants.
Page 111 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1705 34. Section 918.12, s. 918.125, or s. 918.13, relating to
1706 tampering with or harassing court officials, retaliating against
1707 court officials, and tampering with evidence.
1708 (2) "Unlawful debt" means any money or other thing of
1709 value constituting principal or interest of a debt that is
1710 legally unenforceable in this state in whole or in part because
1711 the debt was incurred or contracted:
1712 (a) In violation of any one of the following provisions of
1713 law:
1714 1. Section 550.235 or s. 550.3551, relating to dogracing
1715 and horseracing.
1716 2. Chapter 550, relating to jai alai frontons.
1717 3. Section 687.071, relating to criminal usury and loan
1718 sharking.
1719 4. Section 849.09, s. 849.14, s. 849.15, s. 849.23, or s.
1720 849.25, relating to gambling.
1721 Section 36. Paragraph (a) of subsection (12) of section
1722 895.02, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1723 895.02 Definitions.—As used in ss. 895.01-895.08, the
1724 term:
1725 (12) "Unlawful debt" means any money or other thing of
1726 value constituting principal or interest of a debt that is
1727 legally unenforceable in this state in whole or in part because
1728 the debt was incurred or contracted:
1729 (a) In violation of any one of the following provisions of
Page 112 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 189 2026
1730 law:
1731 1. Section 550.235 or s. 550.3551, relating to dogracing
1732 and horseracing.
1733 2. Chapter 550, relating to jai alai frontons.
1734 3. Section 551.109, relating to slot machine gaming.
1735 4. Chapter 687, relating to interest and usury.
1736 5. Section 849.09, s. 849.14, s. 849.15, s. 849.23, or s.
1737 849.25, relating to gambling.
1738 Section 37. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 113 of 113
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb189-03-c3